Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.300

System abolished—Date—Transfer of assets, liabilities, and responsibilities.

Notwithstanding any provisions of chapter 41.44 RCW to the contrary, the statewide employees' retirement system shall no longer exist after January 1, 1972, at which time all assets, liabilities, and responsibilities of the statewide city employees' retirement system shall be transferred to and assumed by the Washington public employees' retirement system as provided for in *RCW 41.40.405 through 41.40.407.

[ 1971 c 75 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.40.405 through 41.40.407 were decodified pursuant to 1991 c 35 s 4.